North Carolina, session 2025, HB520.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 75-100 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(10) A telephone number is the property of a telephone subscriber, subject to the
terms and conditions of the subscriber's contract with a telephone carrier."
SECTION 2. G.S. 75-101(10) reads as rewritten:
"(10) Telephone solicitor. – Any individual, business establishment, business, or
other legal entity doing business in this State that, directly or through
salespersons or agents, makes or attempts to make telephone solicitations or
causes telephone solicitations to be made. made, and any agent of that
individual, business establishment, business, or legal entity. "Telephone
solicitor" also includes any party defined as a "telemarketer" under the
Telemarketing Sales Rule."
SECTION 3. G.S. 75-102 reads as rewritten:
"§ 75-102. Restrictions on telephone solicitations.
…
(i) No telephone solicitor shall cause misleading information to be transmitted to users
of caller identification technologies or otherwise block or misrepresent the origin of the telephone
solicitation. solicitation or use any other alteration to the origin of the telephone solicitation that
displays in a way to give the perception that the call originated from any other origin except the
actual origin of the telephone solicitation. No provider of telephone caller identification services
shall be held liable for violations of this subsection committed by other individuals or entities. It
is not a violation of this subsection for a telephone solicitor to utilize the name and number of
*H520-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the entity the solicitation is being made on behalf of rather than the name and number of the
telephone solicitor.
(j) A telephone solicitor or its agent that makes telephone solicitations on its behalf,
provided that the telephone solicitor ensures compliance by its agent, shall keep a record for a
period of 24 months from the date a telephone solicitation is made of the legal name, any fictitious
name used, the resident address, the telephone number, and the job title of each individual who
makes a telephone solicitation for that telephone solicitor. If an individual who makes telephone
solicitations for a telephone solicitor uses a fictitious name, the fictitious name shall be traceable
only to the specific individual.
…."
SECTION 4. Article 4 of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 75-104.1. Telephone carriers.
(a) A telephone carrier shall not knowingly and intentionally transmit, sell, or otherwise
provide the numbers of telephone subscribers to any entity the telephone carrier knows (i) will
use the number to violate provisions of this Article, (ii) has previously used telephone subscriber
information to violate provisions of this Article, or (iii) has previously provided the information
to another entity that has violated provisions of this Article.
(b) A telephone carrier shall not be held liable for a telemarketer's violation of
G.S. 75-102(i)."
SECTION 5. G.S. 75-105 reads as rewritten:
"§ 75-105. Enforcement.
…
(b) A telephone subscriber who has received a telephone solicitation from or on behalf
of a telephone solicitor in violation of this Article may bring any of the following actions in civil
court:
(1) An action to enjoin further violations of this Article by the telephone solicitor.
(2) An action to recover five hundred dollars ($500.00) for the first violation, one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for the second violation, and five thousand dollars
($5,000) for the third and any other violation that occurs within two years of
the first violation.
(3) An action to recover ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each call placed in
knowing violation of G.S. 75-102(i).
…."
SECTION 6. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to phone
calls placed on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 520-Second Edition